California statutes. Education Code
(b) The State Librarian may award grants on a competitive basis or shall contract with instructional resource developers to prepare the instructional resources consistent with the state curriculum framework and content standards where the teaching of Native American history is identified, and shall consult with a broadly based group of experts to advise upon and review the instructional resources. The instructional resources shall be subject to Section 13041 and all other relevant statutes governing the content of educational materials prior to distribution to the public schools.

(c) In carrying out subdivision (b), the State Librarian is encouraged to do or enable each of the following, to the extent possible:

(1) Involve California Native Americans in the development of the instructional resources.

(2) Consult with local and regional consortia of organizations and individuals engaged in similar educational, research, and development efforts.

(3) Coordinate and collaborate with organizations and individuals engaging in similar educational, research, and development endeavors.

(4) Utilize creative and innovative methods and approaches in research for, and development of, the instructional resources.

(5) Seek matching funds, in-kind contributions, or other sources of support to supplement the funds provided in support of this part.

(6) Propose the use of a variety of media, including new technology and the arts, to creatively and strategically appeal to pupils while enhancing and enriching community-based educational efforts.

(7) Include scholarly inquiry related to the variety of experiences of California Native Americans.

(8) Add relevant materials to, or catalogue relevant materials in, libraries and other repositories for the creation, publication, and distribution of bibliographies, curriculum guides, oral histories, and other resource directories and supporting the continued development of scholarly work on this subject by making a broad range of archival, library, and research materials more accessible to the American public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 870, Sec. 2.   Effective October 14, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13041.

(a) The State Librarian shall submit to the Curriculum Development and Supplemental Materials Commission the instructional resources developed pursuant to Section 13040.

(b) The Curriculum Development and Supplemental Materials Commission shall hold a public hearing regarding the instructional resources and shall recommend them, along with any modifications that the commission determines to be appropriate, to the State Board of Education.

(c) (1) The State Board of Education shall hold a public hearing regarding the recommendation of the Curriculum Development and Supplemental Materials Commission pursuant to subdivision (b) and shall approve the instructional resources along with any modifications that the State Board of Education determines to be appropriate.

(2) The State Board of Education shall review the instructional resources approved pursuant to subdivision (c) in relation to the history-social science content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605 and shall, at any subsequent revision, make adjustments, if any, to the content standards that it determines to be appropriate. The State Board of Education shall also ensure that the approved instructional resources are used as an advisory tool in developing the next revision of the history-social science curriculum framework and standards.

(d) Upon approval by the State Board of Education pursuant to subdivision (c), the instructional resources shall be made available to educators as efficiently and effectively as available funding will allow.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 870, Sec. 2.   Effective October 14, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13042.

On or before January 1, 2003, the State Librarian shall report to the Governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of each house of the Legislature on the use of funds provided for the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 870, Sec. 2.   Effective October 14, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 9. FINANCE [14000. - 14550.]



  CHAPTER 1. State School Fund [14000. - 14058.]



  ARTICLE 1. Sources, Conditions of Apportionments, Amounts of Support Per Average Daily Attendance [14000. - 14022.5.]

14000.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the administration of the laws governing the financial support of the public school system in this state be conducted within the purview of the following principles and policies:

The system of public school support should be designed to strengthen and encourage local responsibility for control of public education. Local school districts should be so organized that they can facilitate the provision of full educational opportunities for all who attend the public schools. Local control is best accomplished by the development of strong, vigorous, and properly organized local school administrative units. It is the state’s responsibility to create or facilitate the creation of local districts of sufficient size to properly discharge local responsibilities and to spend the tax dollar effectively.

The system of public school support should assure that state, local, and other funds are adequate for the support of a realistic funding level. It is unrealistic and unfair to the less wealthy districts to provide for only a part of the financing necessary for an adequate educational program.

The system of public school support should permit and encourage local school districts to provide and support improved district organization and educational programs. The system of public school support should prohibit the introduction of undesirable organization and educational practices, and should discourage any of those practices now in effect. Improvement of programs in particular districts is in the interests of the state as a whole as well as of the people in individual districts, since the excellence of the programs in some districts will tend to bring about program improvement in other districts.

The system of public school support should make provision for the apportionment of state funds to local districts on a strictly objective basis that can be computed as well by the local districts as by the state. The principle of local responsibility requires that the granting of discretionary powers to state officials over the distribution of state aid and the granting to these officials of the power to impose undue restriction on the use of funds and the conduct of educational programs at the local level be avoided.

The system of public school support should effect a partnership between the state, the county, and school districts, with each participating equitably in accordance with its relative ability. The respective abilities should be combined to provide a financial plan between the state and the local agencies for public school support. Toward this support program, each county and district, through a uniform method, should contribute in accordance with its true financial ability.

The system of public school support should provide for essential educational opportunities for all who attend the public schools. Provision should be made in the financial plan for adequate financing of all educational services.

The broader based taxing power of the state should be utilized to raise the level of financial support in the properly organized but financially weak districts of the state, thus contributing greatly to the equalization of educational opportunity for the students residing therein. It should also be used to provide a minimum amount of guaranteed support to all districts, for that state assistance serves to develop among all districts a sense of responsibility to the entire system of public education in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, upon certification of the Superintendent pursuant to Sections 41330, 41332, and 41335, any amount necessary to meet the requirements of programs specified in subdivision (b) during each fiscal year are hereby continuously appropriated from the General Fund to Section A of the State School Fund for allocation by the Controller.

(2) The amounts calculated for the programs specified in subdivision (b) are considered final as of the certification of the second principal apportionment in the fifth succeeding fiscal year, inclusive, of the fiscal year for which the calculation is being made. Final submissions shall be submitted pursuant to
 procedures and timeframes established by the Superintendent. This paragraph does not apply to a change that is the result of an audit exception, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 41341.

(b) Programs included for purposes of this section are all of the following:

(1) Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 2574) of Part 2.

(2) Section 41544.

(3) Section 41850.1.

(4) Article 2 (commencing with Section 42238) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2, except Section 42238.024.

(5) Section 47663.

(6) Article 7 (commencing with Section 48300) of Chapter 2 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(7) Article 10 (commencing with Section 48350) of Chapter 2 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, if, for an upcoming fiscal year, the total amount necessary to meet the requirements of the programs specified in subdivision (b) is projected to be in excess of 89 percent of the General Fund and Education Protection Account revenues and allocated proceeds of taxes that are necessary to meet the requirements of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, excluding appropriations made to the Chancellor of the
 California Community Colleges for allocation to community college districts, then before the enactment of the annual Budget Act for that fiscal year, the Director of Finance may reduce the following to a percentage equal to or greater than the projected growth rate of the minimum amount necessary to meet the requirements of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, but not less than zero:

(A) The adjustments required pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2574, subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2574, subdivision (b) of Section 2575.1, paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, and Section 42287.

(B) The inflation or cost-of-living adjustment otherwise authorized or required for all of the following
 programs:

(i) Subdivision (b) of Section 8265 or its successor section.

(ii) Subdivision (c) of Section 49536.

(iii) Subdivision (b) of Section 56836.142.

(iv) Subdivision (d) of Section 17581.6 of the Government Code.

(2) The percentage reductions made pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall be no less than the percentage reductions made pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed to change the adjustment identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02
 for a prior fiscal year.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the Director of Finance shall report to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, before the enactment of the annual Budget Act each fiscal year any amounts or percentages reduced from inflation or cost-of-living adjustments pursuant to paragraph (1) for the upcoming fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 194, Sec. 5.   (SB 141)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.05.

Notwithstanding any other law, the following provisions govern transfers to Section A of the State School Fund:

(a) State moneys appropriated in support of the programs listed in subdivision (a) of Section 14041 and appropriated pursuant to Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution and Section 41300.1 shall be transferred to Section A of the State School Fund for allocation in the amount and manner specified for each program. The moneys appropriated shall be applied to meet the requirements of Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(b) State moneys appropriated in support of elementary and secondary education programs other than those described in subdivision (a) shall
 not be transferred to Section A of the State School Fund, but shall be deemed transferred to Section A of the State School Fund and shall be applied to meet the requirements of Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution, as specified in Section 41975.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 15.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of determining (a) the amounts to be certified pursuant to Sections 14002 and 14004, (b) allocations made pursuant to Section 41301, (c) the apportionments required to be made pursuant to Sections 41330, 41332, and 41335, (d) revenue limits for school districts pursuant to Section 42238, as adjusted pursuant to Sections 42238.14, 42238.145, and 42238.146, and (e) revenue limits for county offices of education pursuant to Section 2558, as adjusted pursuant to Sections 2558.4, 2558.45, and 2558.46, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall use the property tax estimates received from county auditors pursuant to Section 75.70 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 227, Sec. 7.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.5.

In making the computation prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 14002, the Controller shall cumulatively increase the seventy-nine cents ($0.79) amount prescribed by that subdivision by 6 percent annually, and shall cumulatively increase the twenty-one dollar and fifty cents ($21.50) amount prescribed by that subdivision by 6 percent annually.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

14003.

(a) Commencing with the 2010–11 fiscal year, on March 28 of each fiscal year in which the percentage growth in per capita General Fund revenues exceeds the percentage growth in California per capita personal income, the Controller shall transfer from the General Fund to Sections A and B of the State School Fund, as set forth in subdivision (c), the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1) minus the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (2).

(1) The product of General Fund revenues from proceeds of taxes and one-half of the difference between the percentage growth in per capita General Fund revenues from proceeds of taxes and in California per capita personal income.

(2) The amount of the maintenance factor certified pursuant to Section 41207.2 that is allocated in the current year pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(b) The amount transferred pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be in addition to amounts required to be allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(c) (1) Of the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (a), the Controller shall transfer 92 percent to Section A of the State School Fund. The Superintendent shall allocate the funds transferred pursuant to this paragraph in the following priority order:

(A) An amount not to exceed two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) for the purposes of revenue limit equalization in a manner consistent with Section 42238.49 for the first fiscal year in which funds are transferred pursuant to this paragraph.

(B) Such amounts as necessary to reduce the revenue limit deficit factors set forth in Sections 2558.46 and 42238.146 until the deficit factors are reduced to zero.

(C) Any remaining amounts transferred pursuant to this paragraph shall be allocated as an equal increase per unit of average daily attendance in general purpose apportionments for purposes of Sections 2558, 42238, and 47633.

(2) Of the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (a), the Controller shall transfer 8 percent to Section B of the State School Fund. The Chancellor of the Community Colleges shall allocate the funds transferred pursuant to this paragraph in equal amounts for the following purposes:

(A) For purposes of career and technical education pursuant to Chapter 352 of the Statutes of 2005.

(B) As a proportionate increase in general purpose apportionments for community college districts.

(d) For purposes of determining the amount required pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3), as applicable, of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the following fiscal year, all amounts transferred in the prior fiscal year pursuant to this section shall be deemed allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB for that prior fiscal year.

(e) The sum of the amounts transferred pursuant to this section plus the sum of the amounts of the maintenance factor certified pursuant to Section 41207.2 that is allocated pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution shall not exceed the total amount of eleven billion two hundred twelve million nine hundred nine thousand dollars ($11,212,909,000) less any maintenance factor amount that is allocated for the 2009–10 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 2.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Sec. 7 of Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.

In addition to all other funds appropriated and transferred to Section A of the State School Fund, the Controller shall annually transfer from the General Fund to Section A of this State School Fund for apportionment during the fiscal year a total amount per pupil in average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year credited to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all county superintendents of schools in the state as certified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction of fourteen cents ($0.14).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.5.

(a) In addition to all other funds appropriated and transferred to Section A of the State School Fund, the Controller shall annually transfer from the General Fund to Section A of the State School Fund for apportionment during the fiscal year a total amount per pupil in average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year credited to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all the county superintendents of schools in the state as certified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, of twenty-one dollars and eighty cents ($21.80) for fiscal year 1978–79 and thirty-four dollars and fifty-one cents ($34.51) for fiscal year 1979–80, for apportionments allowed pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 56300) of Chapter 2 of Part 30.

(b) Funds appropriated pursuant to this section and funds available pursuant to Section 41301 shall be used for Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000), including the Master Plan for Special Education (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 56300) of Part 30). For the 1977–78 fiscal year, the superintendent shall adjust all special education allowances not previously adjusted pursuant to Chapter 219 of the Statutes of 1977 by 6 percent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 1247 of the Statutes of 1977, and subject to future budget acts, the funds provided in subdivision (a) for the purpose of providing special education services pursuant to Section 56300 shall be sixty-three dollars and fifty-six cents ($63.56) for the 1980–81 fiscal year and one hundred thirteen dollars and eighty-two cents ($113.82) for the 1981–82 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.

(a) The amount to be transferred to Section A of the State School Fund under Section 14002 shall in each fiscal year be adjusted for errors of average daily attendance reported in prior fiscal years. Adjustment of such errors will be subject to the time limitations as provided in Section 41341. Such adjustments with regard to the amount to be transferred to Section A of the State School Fund shall be at the state’s rate of contribution under Section 14002 in effect in the fiscal year to which the error applied, and shall be applied in accordance with the purposes set forth under Section 41300. The amount of any adjustment shall not, however, cause the amount to be transferred to Section A of the State School Fund during any fiscal year under Section 14002 to be less than one hundred eighty dollars ($180) per pupil in average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year credited to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all county superintendents of schools in the state.

(b) If in any fiscal year the amount transferred to Section A of the State School Fund under Section 41304 is reported to be in error, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify the Controller of such error, and he shall add to or withhold from the next apportionment moneys due the district by transfers from or returns to the General Fund of such erroneous amounts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.

In addition to all other funds appropriated and transferred to Section A of the State School Fund, the Controller shall annually transfer from the General Fund to Section A of the State School Fund for apportionment during the fiscal year a total amount of nine cents ($0.09) per pupil in average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year credited to all elementary, high, and unified school districts and to all county superintendents of schools in the state, as certified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, for the purposes of Section 41301.5.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

14020.1.

Instructional Improvement and Accountability

The amount transferred to Section B of the State School Fund pursuant to Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the State Constitution shall to the maximum extent feasible be expended or encumbered during the year received solely for the purposes of instructional improvement and accountability.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “instructional improvement and accountability” shall mean expenditures for instructional activities for college sites which directly benefit the instruction of students and shall be limited to expenditures for the following:

(1) Programs which require individual assessment and counseling of students for the purpose of designing a curriculum for each student and establishing a period of time within which to achieve the goals of that curriculum and the support services needed to achieve these goals, provided that any such program shall first have been approved by the Board of Governors of Community Colleges.

(2) Instructional supplies, instructional equipment, and instructional materials and support services necessary to improve campus conditions.

(3) Faculty development which improves instruction and increases the quality and effectiveness of instructional staff, as mutually determined by faculty and the community college district governing board.

(4) Compensation of faculty.

(b) Funds transferred to each community college district pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a separate account and shall be maintained and appropriated separately from funds from all other sources. Funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall supplement other resources of each community college district and shall not supplant funds appropriated from any other source.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 98, Sec. 10.   Note: Prop. 98 is titled The Classroom Instructional Improvement and Accountability Act.)
-------------------------------------------

14022.

(a) For the purposes of Section 8 and Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, ’enrollment’ shall mean:

(1) In community college districts, full-time equivalent students receiving services, and

(2) In school districts, average daily attendance when students are counted as average daily attendance and average daily attendance equivalents for services not counted in average daily attendance.

(b) Determination of enrollment shall be based upon actual data from prior years and for the next succeeding year such enrollments shall be estimated enrollments adjusted for actual data as actual data becomes available.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 98, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14022.3.

(a) For purposes of calculating “increases in enrollment” pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the term “enrollment” for school districts, community college districts, and state agencies providing direct elementary and secondary level instructional services means the sum of the following:

(1) Second principal apportionment regular average daily attendance for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.5, and as adjusted for any average daily attendance audit findings.

(2) Annual average daily attendance for county offices of education, as
 calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41601, and as adjusted for any average daily attendance audit findings.

(b) Any determination or computation of enrollment for purposes of this section shall be based upon actual data from prior years. For the next succeeding year, any determination or computation of enrollment for purposes of this section shall be the estimated enrollment, adjusted as actual data become available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 4.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14022.5.

(a) For purposes of Section 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the term “enrollment” shall have the following meaning for school districts, community college districts, and state agencies providing direct elementary and secondary level instructional services:

(1) In school districts:

(A) The average daily attendance of each school district reported for the second principal apportionment pursuant to Section 41601.

(B) The annual average daily attendance for adult education programs and classes, as determined under subdivision (d) of Section 41601.

(C) The annual average daily attendance for regional occupational centers and programs, as determined under subdivision (d) of Section 41601.

(D) The average daily attendance of apprentices enrolled in any class and reported pursuant to Section 8150, except that one unit of average daily attendance, for purposes of this paragraph, shall equal 525 hours of apprenticeship instruction in an apprenticeship program operated pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(E) (i) The annual average daily attendance for children enrolled in a state preschool program under the Child Care and Development Services Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6), except that one unit of average daily attendance, for purposes of this clause, shall equal 700 hours of preschool services.

(ii) The annual average daily attendance for children enrolled in any other program under the Child Care and Development Services Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6), except that one unit of average daily attendance, for purposes of this clause, shall equal 250 days of services. For the purposes of this clause, less than four hours per day of services shall be defined as one-half day, from four up to six and one-half hours per day shall be defined as three-fourths day, and six and one-half hours or more per day shall be defined as one full day.

(F) The annual average daily attendance of pupils enrolled in summer school, computed pursuant to Section 42239, except that one unit of average daily attendance shall equal 700 hours of summer school instruction in an approved summer school program.

(G) The annual average daily attendance for pupils enrolled in an educational program offered by a county office of education, as determined pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 41601.

(2) In community college districts:

(A) The annual average daily attendance of a community college district computed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 84500) of Part 50, until Section 84750 becomes operative, and thereafter the number of full-time equivalent students as computed pursuant to Section 84750.

(B) The annual average daily attendance for evening community college programs designated as adult schools pursuant to Section 78401, as determined pursuant to Section 78405.

(C) The annual average daily attendance of apprentices enrolled in any class and reported pursuant to Section 8150, except that one unit of average daily attendance, for purposes of this paragraph, shall equal 525 hours of apprenticeship instruction in an apprenticeship program operated pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(3) In state agencies that provide direct elementary and secondary level instructional services:

(A) The annual average daily attendance equivalent for pupils enrolled in the State Schools for the Handicapped pursuant to Part 32 (commencing with Section 59000).

(B) The annual average daily attendance equivalent for pupils attending an educational program administered by the Department of the Youth Authority pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1120) and Article 10 (commencing with Section 1250) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Chapter 3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) The annual average daily attendance equivalent for pupils in the state hospitals operated by the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 56850) of Part 30.

(b) Any determination or computation of enrollment for purposes of this section shall be based upon actual data from prior years. For the next succeeding year, any determination or computation of enrollment for purposes of this section shall be the estimated enrollment, adjusted as actual data become available.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 1990, and as of that date is repealed, unless Senate Constitutional Amendment No. 1 is ratified by the voters at the statewide election to be held on June 5, 1990.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 83) by Stats. 1989, Ch. 92, Sec. 1.   Effective July 6, 1989.   Note: Repeal condition failed; SCA 1 was adopted June 5, 1990, as Prop. 111.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Maintenance, Amount and Manner of Drawing Warrants [14040. - 14044.]

14040.

The Controller shall keep a separate account of the State School Fund, and of the interest and income thereof, together with such money as is raised by special tax or otherwise for school purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.

(a) The Controller shall draw warrants on the State Treasury in favor of the county treasurer of each county in each month of each year in the amounts and manner prescribed in this section so as to provide in each warrant a portion of the total amount certified by the Superintendent as apportioned for programs identified in paragraph (1) during the fiscal year from the State School Fund to the school districts and charter schools under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools of that county, to the county school service fund of that county, and to the county school tuition fund of that county.

(1) Programs to be included in the apportionment include all of the following:

(A) Section
 8820.

(B) Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 2574) of Part 2.

(C) Sections 41330 to 41343, inclusive.

(D) Section 41544.

(E) Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 41600) of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(F) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 41760.2) of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(G) Section 41841.5.

(H) Section 41850.1.

(I) Article 2 (commencing with Section 42238) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(J) Section 46120.

(K) Section 47663.

 (L) Article 7 (commencing with Section 48300) of Chapter 2 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(M) Article 10 (commencing with Section 48350) of Chapter 2 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(N) Sections 56428, 56432, 56836 to 56836.13, inclusive, and 56836.165 to 56836.31, inclusive.

(O) Article 2.2 (commencing with Section 56836.14) of Chapter 7.2 of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(P) Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 56836.39) of Chapter 7.2 of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(2) Warrants for
 amounts apportioned to school districts, county school service funds, and county school tuition funds shall be for amounts equal to 5 percent in July, 5 percent in August, and 9 percent in September, October, November, December, and January, of the amounts certified by the Superintendent as a part of the advance apportionment.

(3) Warrants in the months of February to May, inclusive, shall be for amounts equal to one-fifth of the difference between the amounts certified by the Superintendent for school districts, county school service funds, and county school tuition funds as the first principal apportionment and the amounts required by paragraph (2).

(4) Warrants for the month of June shall be for amounts equal to the difference between the amounts certified by the Superintendent for school districts, county school service funds, and county school tuition funds as the second
 principal apportionment and the amounts required by paragraphs (2) and (3).

(5) Warrants in June shall include the total amounts certified by the Superintendent as the final apportionment.

(6) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) to the contrary, for school districts that reported less than 5,000 units of average daily attendance in the 1979–80 fiscal year and that received 39 percent or more, but less than 75 percent, of their total revenue limits from local property taxes in that fiscal year, warrants for amounts apportioned to the school districts shall be for amounts equal to 15 percent in July, August, September, and October; zero percent in November and December; and 6 percent in January of the amounts certified by the Superintendent as a part of the advance apportionment. Warrants for amounts apportioned to the school districts for the months of February to May, inclusive, shall
 be in accordance with paragraph (3), and for the month of June, shall be in accordance with paragraph (4).

(7) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) or (6) to the contrary, for school districts that reported less than 5,000 units of average daily attendance in the 1979–80 fiscal year and that received 75 percent or more of their total revenue limits from local property taxes in that fiscal year, warrants for amounts apportioned to the school districts shall be for amounts equal to 15 percent in July; 30 percent in August and September; 15 percent in October; zero percent in November and December; 6 percent in January; and zero percent in February, March, April, and May, of the amounts certified by the Superintendent as a part of the advance apportionment. Warrants for the month of June shall be in accordance with paragraph (4).

(8) (A) Notwithstanding any other law,
 for the 2012–13 fiscal year only, for purposes of warrants drawn on the State Treasury pursuant to this section, the amount certified by the Superintendent as the advance apportionment and first principal apportionment shall include the following reduction:

(i) The Superintendent shall multiply six billion nine hundred twenty-one million five hundred twenty-two thousand dollars ($6,921,522,000) by the ratio of the revenue limit or charter school general purposes funding for each county office of education, school district, or charter school, to the statewide total of revenue limit and charter school general purpose funding.

(ii) For each county office of education, school district, or charter school, the Superintendent shall subtract the amount calculated in clause (i) from the apportionments calculated pursuant to Sections 2558, 42238, and 47633.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2012–13 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall delay the second principal apportionment calculated pursuant to Section 41335 from July 2, 2013, to July 15, 2013, to account for all revenues remitted to school districts and county offices of education pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. The Superintendent shall ensure that the second principal apportionment calculated pursuant to Section 41335 accounts for the difference between the amount distributed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and the offsets listed in subparagraph (A). Nothing in this section shall delay the payment of warrants to school districts and county offices of education 10 days before the close of the state’s fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (B) of
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(9) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), (3), or (7), as those paragraphs and this section read on June 1, 2018, for the 2012–13 fiscal year only, the Superintendent shall reduce the June warrants for any amounts received pursuant to Sections 34179.5 and 34179.6 of the Health and Safety Code. This reduction shall constitute the entire amount distributed pursuant to Sections 34179.5 and 34179.6 of the Health and Safety Code and offset pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (h) of Section 42238, paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 2558, and Section 56836.08.

(b) The drawing of the warrants required to be drawn during any one of the months mentioned may be postponed by the Controller for not to exceed 30 days, but the total amounts due the several counties during any
 fiscal year shall be paid within the fiscal year. The warrants shall be paid by the Treasurer from the State School Fund and are not subject to Section 925.6 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 49, Sec. 3.   (SB 115)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.1.

(a) Except as provided pursuant to subdivision (b), notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (b) of Section 14041, for the 2008–09 fiscal year only:

(1) Warrants for amounts allowed to the county school service funds under subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 14054 shall be for amounts equal to 0.9 percent in July, 12 percent in August, 15.1 percent in September, and 8 percent in each remaining month of the fiscal year of the amounts certified by the Superintendent as a part of the advance apportionment.
